Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1042.
do enact as follows:SB1042,11Section 1. 59.692 (1d) of the statutes is repealed.SB1042,22Section 2. 59.692 (1k) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,3,2359.692 (1k) (a) (intro.) The department may not impair the interest of a 4landowner in shoreland property by establishing establish a shoreland zoning 5standard, and a county may not impair the interest of a landowner in shoreland 1property by enacting or enforcing enact or enforce a shoreland zoning ordinance, 2that does any of the following:SB1042,33Section 3. 59.692 (1k) (a) 2. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,3,8459.692 (1k) (a) 2. (intro.) Except as provided in par. pars. (ag) and (b), requires 5any approval or imposes any fee or mitigation requirement for, or otherwise 6prohibits or regulates, the maintenance, repair, replacement, restoration, 7rebuilding, or remodeling of all or any part of any of the following if the activity does 8not expand the footprint of the structure:SB1042,49Section 4. 59.692 (1k) (a) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,3,151059.692 (1k) (a) 2m. Except as provided in pars. (ag), (b), and (bm), requires 11any approval or imposes any fee or mitigation requirement for, or otherwise 12prohibits or regulates, the maintenance, repair, replacement, restoration, 13rebuilding, or remodeling of all or any part of a structure listed under sub. (1n) (d) 14that was legally constructed wholly or partially within the shoreland setback area if 15the activity does not expand the footprint of the existing structure.SB1042,516Section 5. 59.692 (1k) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,3,221759.692 (1k) (a) 4. Requires Except as provided in par. (ag), requires any 18approval or imposes any fee or mitigation requirement for, or otherwise prohibits or 19regulates, the vertical expansion of a nonconforming structure or a structure of 20which any part is legally located in the shoreland setback area by operation of a 21variance granted before July 13, 2015, unless the vertical expansion would extend 22more than 35 feet above grade level.SB1042,623Section 6. 59.692 (1k) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB1042,4,2159.692 (1k) (ag) The department or a county may impose a fee with respect to 2the activities described in par. (a) 2., 2m., and 4.SB1042,73Section 7. 59.692 (1k) (am) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,4,8459.692 (1k) (am) (intro.) The department may not impair the interest of a 5landowner in shoreland property by establishing establish a shoreland zoning 6standard, and a county may not impair the interest of a landowner in shoreland 7property by enacting or enforcing enact or enforce a shoreland zoning ordinance, 8that establishes standards for impervious surfaces unless all of the following apply:SB1042,89Section 8. 59.692 (2m) of the statutes is repealed.SB1042,910Section 9. 59.692 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,4,161159.692 (4) (b) Variances and appeals regarding shorelands within a county 12are for the board of adjustment for that county under s. 59.694, and the procedures 13of that section apply. Notwithstanding s. 59.694 (4), the department may not 14appeal a decision of the county to grant or deny a variance under this section but 15may, upon the request of a county board of adjustment, issue an opinion on whether 16a variance should be granted or denied.SB1042,1017Section 10. 59.692 (5m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,4,201859.692 (5m) If a county has in effect on or after July 14, 2015, a provision in 19an ordinance that is inconsistent with sub. (1d), (1f), or (1k), or (2m), the provision 20does not apply and may not be enforced.SB1042,1121Section 11. 61.353 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,5,22261.353 (3) (intro.) A village ordinance enacted under this section shall accord 1and be consistent with the requirements and limitations under s. 59.692 (1d), (1f), 2and (1k) and shall include at least all of the following provisions:SB1042,123Section 12. 62.233 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1042,5,6462.233 (3) (intro.) A city ordinance enacted under this section shall accord 5and be consistent with the requirements and limitations under s. 59.692 (1d), (1f), 6and (1k) and shall include at least all of the following provisions:SB1042,5,77